Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1114
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Aging and Disability Resource Center Act:

(1) Aging and disability resource center means a community-based entity established to provide information about long-term care services and support and to facilitate access to options counseling to assist eligible individuals and their representatives in identifying the most appropriate services to meet their long-term care needs;

(2) Area agency on aging has the meaning found in section 81-2208;

(3) Center for independent living has the definition found in 29 U.S.C. 796a, as such section existed on January 1, 2018;

(4) Department means the State Unit on Aging of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services or any successor agency designated by the state to fulfill the responsibilities of section 305(a)(1) of the federal Older Americans Act of 1965, 42 U.S.C. 3025(a)(1), as such section existed on January 1, 2018;

(5) Eligible individual means a person who has lost, never acquired, or has one or more conditions that affect his or her ability to perform basic activities of daily living that are necessary to live independently;

(6) Options counseling means a service that assists an eligible individual in need of long-term care and his or her representatives to make informed choices about the services and settings which best meet his or her long-term care needs and that uses uniform data and information collection and encourages the widest possible use of community-based options to allow an eligible individual to live as independently as possible in the setting of his or her choice;

(7) Partnering organization means an organization specializing in serving aging persons or persons with disabilities that has agreed to provide the services described in the Aging and Disability Resource Center Act;

(8) Representative means a person designated as a legal guardian, designated by a power of attorney or a health care power of attorney, or chosen by law, by a court, or by an eligible individual seeking services, but use of the term representative shall not be construed to disqualify an individual who retains all legal and personal autonomy;

(9) Uniform assessment means a single standardized tool used to assess a defined population at a specific time; and

(10) University Center for Excellence in Developmental Disability Education, Research and Service means the federally designated University Center for Excellence in Developmental Disability Education, Research and Service of the Munroe-Meyer Institute at the University of Nebraska Medical Center.

Laws 2015, LB320, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB793, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB856, § 1.